Vermont, session 2025-2026, H902.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER AMENDMENT APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the amendments to the charter of the City
of Barre as set forth in this act. The voters of the City approved the proposals
of amendment on May 13, 2025.
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 1 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 1. CITY OF BARRE
* * *
§ 313. SALE OR LEASE OF CITY PROPERTY
The City Council may authorize the sale or lease of any real or personal
estate belonging to the City, and all conveyances, grants, or leases of such real
estate shall be signed by the Mayor, the City Manager, or any councilor duly
authorized by an action of the City Council.
* * *
§ 601. PAYMENT OF TAXES
* * *
(b) At the close of the fiscal year audit, any unexpended funds remaining
from the City budget may be retained, if approved by vote of the City Council,
as an undesignated fund balance for future use. Any funds retained pursuant to
this provision shall be limited to an amount not greater than five 10 percent of
VT LEG #390175 v.1

No. M-10 Page 2 of 2
2026
the City general fund budget expenses for the most recent voter-approved
fiscal year. Any amount remaining in excess of five percent in the City budget
such amount must be used in the subsequent budget to cut reduce the tax rate.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: June 8, 2026
VT LEG #390175 v.1